Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 6 Designation of Sales Territories and Wholesalers for Out-of-State Brands

Editor’s notes.

The Act which enacted this article stated that the article was to be added to the end of Chapter 4 of Title 3. However, the Code sections comprising the article were enacted as §§ 3-6-150 through 3-6-153, which designations were not consistent with placement in Chapter 4. Therefore, these Code sections were redesignated as §§

3-4-150

through

3-4-153

by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 3, effective February 12, 1985.

3-4-150.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Distilled Spirits Distribution Act.”

History.

Code 1981, § 3-6-150, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 375, § 1; Code 1981, §

3-4-150

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 3.

3-4-151.
Purposes and policies.

This article is promulgated pursuant to the authority granted to the state under the provisions of the Twenty-first Amendment to the United States Constitution specifically for the following purposes and policies:

To prevent unfair business practices, discrimination, and undue control of one segment of the distilled spirits industry by any other segment;

To foster vigorous and healthy competition in the distilled spirits industry;

To promote and keep alive a sound and stable system of distribution of distilled spirits to the public;

To protect public revenues by facilitating the collection and accountability of state and local excise taxes; and

To promote the public health, safety, and welfare of the people of the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, § 3-6-151, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 375, § 1; Code 1981, §

3-4-151

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 3.

3-4-152.
Submission of labels; designation of sales territories and exclusive wholesale distributors; approval by commissioner.

Every manufacturer or shipper shipping distilled spirits for the first time into the state shall:

Submit to the commissioner one label for each brand of distilled spirits to be shipped for the first time by the manufacturer or shipper into this state;

Designate in the application for registration the sales territories for each of its brands sold in this state; and

Name one licensed wholesaler in each territory who shall be the exclusive distributor of the brand within the territory.

Designations of wholesalers and wholesalers’ territories as provided in this Code section shall be initially approved by the commissioner and shall not be changed or initially disapproved except for cause. The commissioner shall determine cause after a hearing under regulations promulgated by the commissioner for such purposes.

History.

Code 1981, § 3-6-152, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 375, § 1; Code 1981, §

3-4-152

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 3.

3-4-153.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall have the authority to adopt such regulations as are consistent with this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 3-6-153, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 375, § 1; Code 1981, §

3-4-153

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 3.